California statutes. Financial Code
No licensee shall take a deed of trust, mortgage, or lien upon real property as security for any loan made under this division, except any lien as is created by law upon the recording of an abstract of judgment. This section shall not apply to any loan of a bona fide principal amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more as determined in accordance with Section 22251.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 347, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22331.

No licensee shall take any confession of judgment or any power of attorney, except a power of attorney taken to effectuate the transfer of the ownership of any motor vehicle or mobilehome at the time of making the loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22332.

No licensee shall take any note or promise to pay that does not accurately disclose the actual amount of the loan, the time for which it is made, and the agreed rate of charge or the annual percentage rate pursuant to Regulation Z promulgated by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 64, Sec. 18.   (AB 2742)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22333.

No licensee shall take any instrument in which blanks are left to be filled in after execution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22334.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a licensee shall not enter into any contract for a loan that provides for a scheduled repayment of principal over more than the maximum terms set forth below opposite the respective size of loans.Principal amount of loanMaximum termLess than $500 24 months and 15 days$500 but less than $1,500 36 months and 15 days$1,500 but less than $3,000 48 months and 15 days$3,000 but less than $10,000 60 months and 15 days(b) The maximum loan term of 60 months and 15 days does not apply to a loan secured by real property of a bona fide principal amount of at least five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(c) A licensee shall not enter into any contract for a loan that provides for a scheduled repayment of principal that is less than 12 months. This subdivision applies to a loan of a bona fide
 principal amount of at least two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(d) This section does not apply to an open-end loan, a student loan made by an eligible lender under the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.), or a student loan made pursuant to the Public Health Service Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 294 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 708, Sec. 8.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22335.

The payment by any person in money, credit, goods, or things in action as consideration for any sale or assignment of, or order for, the payment of wages, salary, commissions, or other compensation for services, whether earned or to be earned, is, for the purposes of regulation under this division, a loan secured by the assignment. The amount by which the assigned compensation exceeds the amount of the consideration actually paid is interest and charges upon or for the loan, calculated from the date of payment to the date the compensation is payable.

This section shall not be construed as modifying or affecting existing statutes governing wage assignments in the state, or as authorizing those assignments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22336.

This article does not prohibit any licensee from contracting for, collecting, or receiving the following:

(a) The statutory fee paid by the licensee to any public officer for acknowledging, filing, recording, or releasing in any public office any instrument securing the loan or executed in connection with the loan.

(b) Premiums paid by the licensee of the kind and to the extent described in paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section
 226.4 of Regulation Z promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (12 C.F.R. 226).

These amounts are not included in determining the maximum charges which may be made under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22337.

Each licensed finance lender shall:

(a) Deliver or cause to be delivered to the borrower, or any one thereof, at the time the loan is made, a statement showing in clear and distinct terms the name, address, and license number of the finance lender and the broker, if any. The statement shall show the date, amount, and maturity of the loan contract, how and when repayable, the nature of the security for the loan, if any, and the agreed rate of charge or the annual percentage rate pursuant to Regulation Z promulgated by the Consumer
 Financial Protection Bureau (12 C.F.R.
 1026).

(b) Obtain from the borrower a signed statement as to whether any person has performed any act as a broker in connection with the making of the loan. If the statement discloses that a broker or other person has participated, then the finance lender shall obtain a full statement of all sums paid or payable to the broker or other person. The finance lender shall keep these statements for a period of three years from and after the date the loan has been paid in full, or has matured according to its terms, or has been charged off.

(c) Permit payment to be made in advance in any amount on any contract of loan at any time. The licensee may apply the payment first to any agreed prepayment penalty, then to all charges due, including charges at the agreed rate or rates up to the date of payment, not to exceed the applicable maximum rate
 permitted by this article.

(d) Deliver or cause to be delivered to the person making any cash payment, or to the person who requests a receipt at the time of making any payment, at the time payment is made on account of any loan, a plain and complete receipt showing the total amount received and identifying the loan contract upon which the payment is applied.

(e) Upon repayment of any loan in full, release all security for the loan, endorse and return any certificate of ownership, and cancel or plainly mark “paid” and return to the borrower or person making final payment, any note, mortgage, security agreement, trust deed, assignment, or order signed by the borrower, or an optical image reproduction thereof, except those documents that are a part of the court record in any action, or that have been delivered to a third person for the purpose of carrying out their terms, or a
 security agreement that secures any other indebtedness of a borrower to the licensee, or original documents otherwise required by law. When a trust deed on real property has been taken as security for a loan that has been subsequently paid in full, a duly executed request for reconveyance shall be delivered to the trustor or trustee for the purpose of recording a reconveyance. A termination statement, furnished to the borrower as provided for in Sections 9512 and 9513 of the Commercial Code, shall be deemed a release of the security when a financing statement has been filed pursuant to Section 9501 of the Commercial Code.

For purposes of this subdivision, an optical image reproduction shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The optical image storage media used to store the document shall be nonerasable write once, read many (WORM) optical image media that does not allow changes to the stored
 document.

(2) The optical image reproduction shall be made consistent with the minimum standards of quality approved by either the National Institute of Standards and Technology or the Association for Information and Image Management.

(3) Written authentication identifying the optical image reproduction as an exact unaltered copy of the note, trust deed, mortgage, security agreement, assignment or order shall be stamped or printed on the optical image reproduction.

(f) Deliver or cause to be delivered to the potential borrower, or any one thereof, at the time the licensee first requires or accepts any signed instrument or the payment of any fee, a statement showing in clear and distinct terms the name, address, and license number of the finance lender and the broker, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 64, Sec. 19.   (AB 2742)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22338.

Each licensed broker shall:

(a) Deliver to the borrower, or any one thereof, at the time the final negotiation or arrangement is made, a statement showing in clear and distinct terms the name, address, and license number of the broker and the finance lender. The statement shall show the date, amount, and terms of the agreement with the broker, and all amounts paid or to be paid to the broker and to any person other than the finance lender.

(b) Deliver to the finance lender making the loan a copy of the statement referred to and described in subdivision (a).

(c) Deliver to the person making any payment to the broker to be retained by the broker, a plain and complete receipt for each payment made, at the time it is made, showing the total amount received, and identifying the brokerage agreement and the loan contract upon which the payment is applied. If the payment is made by a person other than the finance lender, a copy of the receipt shall be delivered to the finance lender.

(d) When the borrower pays the loan in full, ensure that the finance lender fully complies with subdivision (e) of Section 22337.

(e) Deliver to the potential borrower or borrowers, at the time the licensee first requires or accepts any signed instrument or the
 payment of any fee, a statement showing in clear and distinct terms the name, address, and license number of the broker and finance lender.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22339.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to deny to any licensee hereunder the right of taking and using a security agreement that, in addition to securing an original obligation, may secure the repayment of sums that may be advanced to, or expenditures that may be made at the direction of, the borrower subsequent to the execution of the security agreement and prior to the satisfaction thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22340.

(a) A licensee may sell promissory notes evidencing the obligation to repay loans made by the licensee pursuant to this division or evidencing the obligation to repay loans purchased from and made by another licensee pursuant to this division to institutional investors, and may make agreements with institutional investors for the collection of payments or the performance of services with respect to those notes.

(b) For the purpose of this section, “institutional investor”
 means the following:

(1) The United States or any state, district, territory, or commonwealth thereof, or any city, county, city and county, public district, public authority, public corporation, public entity, or political subdivision of a state, district, territory, or commonwealth of the United States, or any agency or other instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing.

(2) A bank, trust company, savings bank or savings and loan association, credit union, industrial bank or industrial loan company, finance lender, residential mortgage lender, or insurance company doing business under the authority of and in accordance with a license, certificate, or charter issued by the United States or any state, district, territory, or commonwealth of the United States.

(3) Trustees of pension, profit sharing, or welfare
 funds, if the pension, profit sharing, or welfare fund has a net worth of not less than fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), except pension, profit sharing, or welfare funds of a licensee or its affiliate, self-employed individual retirement plans, or individual retirement accounts.

(4) A corporation with outstanding securities registered under Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or any wholly owned subsidiary of that corporation; provided, however, that the purchaser represents that it is purchasing for its own account for investment and not with a view to or for sale in connection with any distribution of the promissory note.

(5) A syndication or other combination of any of the foregoing that is organized to purchase the promissory note.

(6) A trust or other business entity established by an
 institutional investor for the purpose of issuing or facilitating the issuance of undivided interests in, the right to receive payments from, or that are payable primarily from, a pool of financial assets held by the trust or business entity if all of the following apply:

(A) The business entity is not a sole proprietorship.

(B) The pool of assets consists of one or more of the following:

(i) Interest bearing obligations.

(ii) Other contractual obligations representing the right to receive payments from the assets.

(iii) Surety bonds, insurance policies, letters of credit, or other instruments providing credit enhancements for these assets.

(C) The interests will be either of the following:

(i) Rated investment grade by Standard & Poor’s Corporation or Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. “Investment grade” means that the securities will be rated by Standard & Poor’s Corporation as AAA, AA, A, or BBB, or by Moody’s Investor Service, Inc., as Aaa, Aa, A, or Baa, including a rating with a “+” or “–” designation or other variations that occur within these ratings.

(ii) Sold to an institutional investor as otherwise defined in this section.

(D) The offer and sale of the securities is qualified under the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code) or is registered under federal securities laws, or is
 exempt from qualification or registration.

(c) In the absence of agreement to the contrary by the licensee and the institutional investor, all payments received from the collection of payments shall be deposited and maintained in a trust account, and shall be disbursed from the trust account only in accordance with the instructions of the owner of the promissory note.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22340.1.

(a) A licensee that is a finance lender may sell to (1) an institutional lender, or (2) an institutional investor described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 22340, promissory notes evidencing the obligation to repay federally related mortgage loans, as defined in Section 1024.2 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, purchased from and made by an institutional lender, and may make agreements for the collection of payments and performance of services with respect to those notes. For purposes of this section, “institutional lender” means any bank, trust
 company, savings bank or savings and loan association, credit union, industrial loan company or residential mortgage lender doing business under the authority of and in accordance with a license, certificate or charter issued by the United States or this state.

(b) In the absence of agreement to the contrary by the licensee and the institutional investor or institutional lender, all payments received from the collection of payments shall be deposited and maintained in a trust account, and shall be disbursed from the trust account only in accordance with the instructions of the owner of the promissory note.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 64, Sec. 20.   (AB 2742)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22341.

(a) No licensee may make a loan to refinance a retail installment contract subject to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1801) of Title 2 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, that is held by the licensee, its subsidiaries, or affiliates, unless all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The buyer has been making installment payments required by the retail installment contract for a period of not less than 90 days. The retail installment contract has a term of not less
 than 180 days and does not provide for any scheduled installment that is more than twice the amount of any other scheduled installment.

(2) The loan provides for additional proceeds other than for insurance in an amount not less than the outstanding principal balance of the retail installment contract and provides for payment in full of the retail installment contract.

(3) The licensee shall not take a security interest in real property that is the principal residence of the borrower unless the loan has a principal amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more and the following notice written in the same language, for example, Spanish, as used in the loan documents, is incorporated into the statement used to comply with Section 22338: 

“WARNING TO BORROWER: IF YOU ACCEPT THIS LOAN YOU WILL BE PUTTING UP YOUR
 HOME AS SECURITY. THIS MEANS THAT YOUR HOME COULD BE SOLD WITHOUT YOUR PERMISSION AND WITHOUT ANY COURT ACTION IF YOU MISS ANY PAYMENT AS REQUIRED BY THIS LOAN.” 

This notice shall be printed in not less than 14-point bold type, shall be set apart from the rest of the statement by a border, and shall appear directly above a signature block which shall be signed by the borrower. A security interest described in this paragraph that is taken without prior notice and the borrower’s signature, as required by this paragraph, shall be void and unenforceable.

(4) The licensee shall not sell, attempt to sell, or agree to sell any goods or services to the borrower, other than credit insurance as defined in Section 22314 and insurance required by the licensee to protect its security interest, until the loan has been in effect for at least 30 days. The amount of insurance required by
 the licensee to protect its security interest shall not exceed the lesser of the principal amount of the loan or the replacement value of the security as determined by the insurer.

(5) A licensee that is an assignee of the retail installment contract shall continue to be subject under the loan to all equities and defenses of the borrower against the seller arising out of the sale, notwithstanding an agreement to the contrary.

(6) The loan shall not provide for any scheduled installment that is more than twice the amount of any other scheduled installment. This paragraph does not apply to a loan of a bona fide principal amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more.

(7) If a loan of a bona fide principal amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more provides for any scheduled installment that is more than twice
 the amount of any other scheduled installment, the loan shall contain the following provision: 

“The payment schedule contained in this loan requires that you make a balloon payment of $____ (amount of balloon payment) which is a payment of more than double the amount of the regular payments. You have an absolute right to obtain a new payment schedule if you default in the payment of any balloon payment.” 

If the borrower defaults in the payment of any balloon payment, the borrower shall be given an absolute right to obtain a new payment schedule. Unless agreed to by the borrower, the installment amounts under the new schedule shall not be substantially greater than the average of the preceding installments.

(b) A loan made pursuant to this section shall be subject to this division and not to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1801) of Title 2 of
 Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(c) An action by any licensee or borrower on a loan made pursuant to this section shall be tried in the county in which the loan was signed by the borrower, in the county in which the borrower resided at the time the loan was entered into, or in the county in which the borrower resides at the commencement of the action.

(d) Paragraphs (6) and (7) of subdivision (a) do not apply to open-end loans.

(e) A security interest provided by any retail installment contract in violation of subdivision (b) of Section 1804.3 of the Civil Code shall not serve as consideration in whole or in part for a loan made under this section, notwithstanding any agreement to the contrary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22342.

(a) As used in this section, “instant loan check” or “live check” means any loan or extension of credit that is made available in the form of a check, draft, or any other negotiable instrument that can be deposited in a bank or used for third-party payments. “Instant loan check” or “live check” does not include a check, draft, or any other negotiable instrument provided in response to an application for credit or as a means of access to an existing loan or extension of credit, including a home equity or personal line of credit.

(b) No person shall produce, advertise, offer, sell, distribute, or otherwise transfer for use in this state any live check unless the document bears the following phrase printed in 12-point type on the front of the document: “THIS IS A LOAN OR AN EXTENSION OF CREDIT. YOU WILL PAY CHARGES.”

(c) Live checks shall only be negotiable for a period of 30 days after the date printed on the live check. Printed material accompanying the live check shall advise the consumer to void and destroy the live check if it is not going to be negotiated.

(d) Loan solicitations shall be mailed in envelopes with no indication that a negotiable instrument is contained in the mailing. Envelopes shall be marked with “do not forward” instructions to the postal service in the event that the intended addressee is no longer at the location.

(e) Any loan solicitation made through a live check shall be honored in the full amount by the issuer unless the account on which the solicitation is made is closed by the consumer prior to the date the check is cashed.

(f) In the event that a live check is stolen or incorrectly received by someone other than the intended payee, and the live check is cashed or otherwise negotiated based upon fraud or misrepresentation by someone other than the intended payee, the following safeguards for the consumer shall apply:

(1) The creditor, upon receipt of notification that the consumer did not negotiate the live check and is a victim of identity theft as defined in Section 1798.92 of the Civil Code, shall provide, and the consumer may complete, a statement confirming that the consumer did not deposit, cash, or otherwise
 negotiate the live check.

(2) Upon completion of the confirmation statement by the consumer, the consumer who was the intended payee shall have no liability for the loan obligation, absent any fraud by that consumer.

(3) Upon receipt of notification that the consumer did not negotiate the live check and is a victim of identity theft as defined in Section 1798.92 of the Civil Code, the creditor shall take appropriate actions set forth in Sections 1785.25 and 1785.26 of the Civil Code.

(g) The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, by order levy administrative penalties against a licensee who violates this section, and the licensee shall be liable for administrative penalties of no more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each willful violation. Any hearing shall be held
 in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted under the act. The remedy available under this subdivision is in addition to any other remedies available to the commissioner under this division that may be employed to enforce the provisions of this section.

(h) Nothing in this section shall preclude the application of any section or rule under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 772, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

22345.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of Section 987 of Title 10 of the United States Code, as amended by 126 Stat. 1785 (Public Law 112-239), or any provision of Part 232 (commencing with Section 232.1) of Subchapter M of Chapter I of Subtitle A of Title 32 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as published on July 22, 2015, on page 43560 in Number 140 of Volume 80 of the Federal Register, violates this chapter.

(b) A person that does not market consumer loans to, or does not extend those loans to, covered borrowers, as that term is defined under Part 232
 (commencing with Section 232.1) of Subchapter M of Chapter I of Subtitle A of Title 32 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended on the date described in subdivision (a), shall not be in violation of Section 394 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 514, Sec. 3.   (SB 266)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

22346.

Any licensee that violates any provision of any of the following federal acts or regulations violates this division:

(a) The federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.).

(b) The federal Truth in Lending Act, as amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.).

(c) The federal Home Ownership Equity Protection Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1639).

(d) Any regulation promulgated under any of the federal acts in subdivision (a), (b), or (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 629, Sec. 6.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

22347.

The unique identifier of any licensed mortgage loan originator shall be clearly shown on all residential mortgage loan application forms, solicitations, or advertisements, including business cards or Internet Web sites, and any other documents as established by rule, regulation, or order of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 42.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.6. Pilot Program for Increased Access to Responsible Small Dollar Loans [22365. - 22381.]

22365.

(a) The Pilot Program for Increased Access to Responsible Small Dollar Loans is hereby established.

(b) For purposes of this article:

(1) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(2) “Program” means the Pilot Program for Increased Access to Responsible Small Dollar Loans.

(3) Pursuant to Section 22380.5, “licensee” also includes a licensee approved to participate in the former Pilot Program for Affordable Credit-Building Opportunities as described in Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 22348).

(c) This article does not apply to either of the following:

(1) A licensee that has not been accepted to participate in the program.

(2) A licensee that has been accepted to participate in the program that chooses to lend pursuant to provisions of this division that are outside of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 137.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22366.

(a) Any entity licensed under this chapter that wishes to participate in the program, that is in good standing with the commissioner and has no outstanding enforcement actions or deficiencies at the time of its application, shall file an application with the commissioner, in a manner prescribed by the commissioner, and shall pay a fee to the commissioner, in an amount calculated by the commissioner to cover its costs to administer this article. 

(b) Any entity wishing to participate in the program that is not licensed pursuant to this chapter may submit a combined application to the commissioner, in a manner prescribed by the commissioner, for licensure under this chapter and
 admission to the program and shall pay a fee to the commissioner in an amount equal to the fees that would have been imposed if the person had submitted separate applications. To be eligible to apply in this manner, an entity must be free of outstanding enforcement or other disciplinary actions taken against it by any of California’s financial regulators or by a financial regulator of another state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 467, Sec. 2.   (SB 318)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22367.

Every entity approved by the commissioner to participate in the program shall file with the commissioner on or before March 15 an annual report consistent with Section 22159, separate from any other annual report the licensee may be required to file.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 467, Sec. 2.   (SB 318)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22368.

Except as otherwise provided, nothing in this article shall exempt any licensee from any of the provisions of this division or Section 1632 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 467, Sec. 2.   (SB 318)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22369.

No licensee may offer or make a loan, nor impose any charges or fees pursuant to Section 22370, nor use a finder pursuant to Section 22371, without prior approval from the commissioner to participate in the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 467, Sec. 2.   (SB 318)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22370.

(a) A loan made pursuant to this section shall comply with the following requirements:

(1) The loan shall be unsecured.

(2) Interest on the loan shall accrue on a simple-interest basis, through the application of a daily periodic rate to the actual unpaid principal balance each day.

(3) The licensee shall disclose the following to the consumer in writing, in a typeface no smaller than 12-point
 type, at the time of application:

(A) The amount borrowed; the total dollar cost of the loan to the consumer if the loan is paid back on time, including the sum of the administrative fee, principal amount borrowed, and interest payments; the corresponding annual percentage rate, calculated in accordance with Federal Reserve Board Regulation Z (12 C.F.R. 226.1 et seq.); the periodic payment amount; the delinquency fee schedule; and the following statement: “Repaying your loan early will lower your borrowing costs by reducing the amount of interest you will pay. This loan has no prepayment penalty.”

(B) A statement that the consumer has the right to rescind the loan by notifying the licensee of the consumer’s intent to rescind the loan and returning the principal advanced by the
 end of the business day following the date the loan is consummated.

(4) A licensee may provide the borrower with the disclosures required by paragraph (3) in a mobile or other electronic application, on which the size of the typeface of the disclosure can be manually modified by a prospective borrower, if the prospective borrower is given the option to print the disclosure in a typeface of at least 12-point size or is provided by the licensee with a hardcopy of the disclosure in a typeface of at least 12-point size before the loan is consummated.

(5) The loan shall have a minimum principal amount upon origination of three hundred dollars ($300) and a term of not less than the following:

(A) Ninety days for loans whose
 principal balance upon origination is less than five hundred dollars ($500).

(B) One hundred twenty days for loans whose principal balance upon origination is at least five hundred dollars ($500), but is less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(C) One hundred eighty days for loans whose principal balance upon origination is at least one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), but is less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(D) One year nor more than five years for loans whose principal balance is more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(b) As an alternative to the charges authorized by Section 22303 or 22304, a
 licensee approved by the commissioner to participate in the program may contract for and receive charges for a loan made pursuant to this section at an annual simple interest rate not to exceed the following:

(1) The lesser of 36 percent or the sum of 32.75 percent plus the United States prime lending rate, as of the date of loan origination, on that portion of the unpaid principal balance of the loan up to and including, but not in excess of, one thousand dollars ($1,000). The interest rate calculated as of the date of loan origination shall be fixed for the life of the loan.

(2) The lesser of 35 percent or the sum of 28.75 percent plus the United States prime lending rate, as of the date of loan origination, on that portion of the unpaid principal balance of the loan in
 excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000), but less than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500). The interest rate calculated as of the date of loan origination shall be fixed for the life of the loan.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) and subject to subdivision (d), a licensee approved by the commissioner to participate in the program shall reduce the interest rates specified in subdivision (b) on each subsequent loan to the same borrower by a minimum of one percentage point, as follows:

(1) The interest rates shall be reduced by one percentage point for loans with contractual terms of two years or less.

(2) In addition to the percentage point in paragraph (1), the interest rates shall be reduced by one additional
 percentage point for every additional contracted partial or full 12-month term.

(3) The interest rates on third and subsequent loans to the same borrower shall be reduced in accordance with paragraphs (1) and (2), but shall represent interest rate reductions relative to the interest rates applicable to the borrower’s prior loan rather than the rates specified in subdivision (b).

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, a licensee shall not be required to reduce the interest rate on a subsequent loan by more than four percentage points relative to the rates specified in subdivision (b).

(5) The interest rate calculated as of the date of the loan origination shall be fixed for the life of the loan.

(d) The interest rate reductions specified in subdivision (c) shall
 apply only if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The subsequent loan is originated no more than 180 days after the prior loan is fully repaid.

(2) The borrower was never more than 15 days delinquent on the prior loan.

(3) The prior loan was outstanding for at least one-half of its original term prior to its repayment.

(e) (1) As to any loan made under this section, a licensee approved by the commissioner to participate in the program may contract for and receive an administrative fee, which shall be fully earned immediately upon making the loan, in an amount not to exceed the applicable of the following:

(A) Seven percent of the principal amount, exclusive of the administrative fee, or ninety dollars ($90), whichever is less, on the first loan made to a borrower.

(B) Six percent of the principal amount, exclusive of the administrative fee, or seventy-five dollars ($75), whichever is less, on the second and subsequent loans made to that borrower.

(2) A licensee shall not charge the same borrower an administrative fee more than once in any four-month period.

(3) For purposes of this section, “refinance” means the replacement or revision of an existing loan contract with a borrower that results in an extension of additional principal to that borrower. A licensee shall not
 refinance a loan made under this section, unless all of the following conditions are met at the time the borrower submits an application to refinance:

(A) The borrower has repaid at least 60 percent of the outstanding principal remaining on his or her loan.

(B) The borrower is current on his or her outstanding loan.

(C) The licensee underwrites the new loan in accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (i).

(D) If the loan proceeds of both the original loan and the refinance loan are to be used for personal, family, or household purposes, the borrower has not previously refinanced the outstanding loan more than once.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), an administrative fee shall not be contracted for or received in connection with the refinancing of a loan unless at least eight months have elapsed since the receipt of a previous administrative fee paid by the borrower. With the exception of a loan that is refinanced, only one administrative fee may be contracted for or received until the loan has been repaid in full. Section 22305 shall not apply to any loan made under this section.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 22320.5, a licensee approved by the commissioner to participate in the program may require reimbursement from a borrower for the actual insufficient funds fees incurred by that licensee due to actions of the borrower, and may contract for and receive a delinquency fee
 that is one of the following amounts:

(1) For a period of delinquency of not less than seven days, an amount not in excess of fourteen dollars ($14).

(2) For a period of delinquency of not less than 14 days, an amount not in excess of twenty dollars ($20).

(g) If a licensee opts to impose a delinquency fee, it shall use the delinquency fee schedule described in subdivision (f), subject to all of the following:

(1) No more than one delinquency fee may be imposed per delinquent payment.

(2) No more than two delinquency fees may be imposed during any period of 30 consecutive days.

(3) No delinquency fee may be imposed on a borrower who is 180 days or more past due if that fee would result in the sum of the borrower’s remaining unpaid principal balance, accrued interest, and delinquency fees exceeding 180 percent of the original principal amount of the borrower’s loan.

(4) The licensee or any of its wholly owned subsidiaries shall attempt to collect a delinquent payment for a period of at least 30 days following the start of the delinquency before selling or assigning that unpaid debt to an independent party for collection.

(h) (1) The licensee shall develop and implement policies and procedures designed to respond to questions raised by applicants and borrowers regarding their
 loans, including those involving finders, and to address customer complaints as soon as reasonably practicable.

(2) The licensee shall perform a reasonable background check on any finders associated with the licensee’s participation in the program.

(i) The following applies to a loan made by a licensee pursuant to this section:
